dicts/it_IT/it_IT.aff
# Copyright 2001, 2002 Gianluca Turconi
# Copyright 2002, 2003, 2004 Gianluca Turconi and Davide Prina
# Copyright 2004, 2005 Davide Prina
#
# E-Mail: DavidePrina(CHIOCCIOLA)yahoo(PUNTO)com
#
# Version 2.2 beta (10/07/2005)
#
# This file is distributed under GPL license
#
# This file is part of the Italian dictionary.
#
# The Italian dictionary is free software; you can redistribute it and/or
# modify it under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published
# by the Free Software Foundation; either version 2 of the License, or
# (at your option) any later version.
#
# The Italian dictionary is distributed in the hope that it will be
# useful, but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE. See the
# GNU General Public License for more details.
#
# You should have received a copy of the GNU General Public
# License along with Italian dictionary,
# if not, write to the Free Software Foundation, Inc.,
# 59 Temple Place, Suite 330, Boston, MA  02111-1307  USA
#
# GPL license can be found here:
# http://www.fsf.org/licenses/licenses.html

SET ISO8859-15
TRY aeiouàéìòùèAEIOUsnrtlcdgmpqhbyfvkwzjxSNRTLCDGMPQHBYFVKWZJX

SFX A Y 225
SFX A e 0 are
SFX A are o are
SFX A are i [^icg]are
SFX A are 0 iare
SFX A are hi [cg]are
SFX A re 0 are
SFX A are iamo [^icg]are
SFX A are iamoci [^icg]are
SFX A are iamola [^icg]are
SFX A are iamolo [^icg]are
SFX A are iamole [^icg]are
SFX A are iamoli [^icg]are
SFX A are iamogli [^icg]are
SFX A are iamone [^icg]are
SFX A are iamocela [^icg]are
SFX A are iamocelo [^icg]are
SFX A are iamocele [^icg]are
SFX A are iamoceli [^icg]are
SFX A are iamocene [^icg]are
SFX A are iamogliela [^icg]are
SFX A are iamoglielo [^icg]are
SFX A are iamogliele [^icg]are
SFX A are iamoglieli [^icg]are
SFX A are iamogliene [^icg]are
SFX A re mo iare
SFX A re moci iare
SFX A re mola iare
SFX A re molo iare
SFX A re mole iare
SFX A re moli iare
SFX A re mone iare
SFX A re mogli iare
SFX A re mogliela iare
SFX A re moglielo iare
SFX A re mogliele iare
SFX A re moglieli iare
SFX A re mogliene iare
SFX A re mocela iare
SFX A re mocelo iare
SFX A re mocele iare
SFX A re moceli iare
SFX A re mocene iare
SFX A are hiamo [cg]are
SFX A are hiamoci [cg]are
SFX A are hiamola [cg]are
SFX A are hiamolo [cg]are
SFX A are hiamole [cg]are
SFX A are hiamoli [cg]are
SFX A are hiamogli [cg]are
SFX A are hiamone [cg]are
SFX A are hiamocela [cg]are
SFX A are hiamocelo [cg]are
SFX A are hiamocele [cg]are
SFX A are hiamoceli [cg]are
SFX A are hiamocene [cg]are
SFX A are hiamogliela [cg]are
SFX A are hiamoglielo [cg]are
SFX A are hiamogliele [cg]are
SFX A are hiamoglieli [cg]are
SFX A are hiamogliene [cg]are
SFX A re tevelo are
SFX A re teveli are
SFX A re tevela are
SFX A re tevele are
SFX A re tevene are
SFX A re teglielo are
SFX A re teglieli are
SFX A re tegliela are
SFX A re tegliele are
SFX A re tegliene are
SFX A re tecelo are
SFX A re teceli are
SFX A re tecela are
SFX A re tecele are
SFX A re tecene are
SFX A re no are
SFX A re vo are
SFX A re vi are
SFX A re va are
SFX A re vamo are
SFX A re vate are
SFX A re vano are
SFX A re i are
SFX A re sti are
SFX A are ò are
SFX A re mmo are
SFX A re ste are
SFX A e ono are
SFX A are erò [^cgi]are
SFX A are erai [^cgi]are
SFX A are erà [^cgi]are
SFX A are eremo [^cgi]are
SFX A are erete [^cgi]are
SFX A are eranno [^cgi]are
SFX A are herò [cg]are
SFX A are herai [cg]are
SFX A are herà [cg]are
SFX A are heremo [cg]are
SFX A are herete [cg]are
SFX A are heranno [cg]are
SFX A are erò [^cg]iare
SFX A are erai [^cg]iare
SFX A are erà [^cg]iare
SFX A are eremo [^cg]iare
SFX A are erete [^cg]iare
SFX A are eranno [^cg]iare
SFX A iare erò [cg]iare
SFX A iare erai [cg]iare
SFX A iare erà [cg]iare
SFX A iare eremo [cg]iare
SFX A iare erete [cg]iare
SFX A iare eranno [cg]iare
SFX A are iate [^icg]are
SFX A are ino [^icg]are
SFX A are hiate [cg]are
SFX A are hino [cg]are
SFX A are no iare
SFX A re ssi are
SFX A re sse are
SFX A re ssimo are
SFX A re ssero are
SFX A are erei [^cgi]are
SFX A are eresti [^cgi]are
SFX A are erebbe [^cgi]are
SFX A are eremmo [^cgi]are
SFX A are ereste [^cgi]are
SFX A are erebbero [^cgi]are
SFX A are herei [cg]are
SFX A are heresti [cg]are
SFX A are herebbe [cg]are
SFX A are heremmo [cg]are
SFX A are hereste [cg]are
SFX A are herebbero [cg]are
SFX A are erei [^cg]iare
SFX A are eresti [^cg]iare
SFX A are erebbe [^cg]iare
SFX A are eremmo [^cg]iare
SFX A are ereste [^cg]iare
SFX A are erebbero [^cg]iare
SFX A iare erei [cg]iare
SFX A iare eresti [cg]iare
SFX A iare erebbe [cg]iare
SFX A iare eremmo [cg]iare
SFX A iare ereste [cg]iare
SFX A iare erebbero [cg]iare
SFX A re nte are
SFX A re ntesi are
SFX A re nti are
SFX A re ntisi are
SFX A re vasi are
SFX A e mici are
SFX A e tici are
SFX A e misi are
SFX A e tisi are
SFX A re tisi are
SFX A e visi are
SFX A e cisi are
SFX A e glisi are
SFX A e lesi are
SFX A e vici are
SFX A e si are
SFX A e mi are
SFX A e ti are
SFX A e ci are
SFX A e le are
SFX A e lo are
SFX A e li are
SFX A e vi are
SFX A e gli are
SFX A e ne are
SFX A e la are
SFX A e telo are
SFX A e tela are
SFX A e teli are
SFX A e tele are
SFX A e tene are
SFX A e melo are
SFX A e mela are
SFX A e meli are
SFX A e mele are
SFX A e mene are
SFX A e selo are
SFX A e sela are
SFX A e seli are
SFX A e sele are
SFX A e sene are
SFX A e celo are
SFX A e cela are
SFX A e celi are
SFX A e cele are
SFX A e cene are
SFX A e velo are
SFX A e vela are
SFX A e veli are
SFX A e vele are
SFX A e vene are
SFX A e glielo are
SFX A e gliela are
SFX A e glieli are
SFX A e gliele are
SFX A e gliene are
SFX A re mi are
SFX A re ti are
SFX A re ci are
SFX A re le are
SFX A re lo are
SFX A re li are
SFX A re gli are
SFX A re ne are
SFX A re la are
SFX A re melo are
SFX A re mela are
SFX A re meli are
SFX A re mele are
SFX A re mene are
SFX A re celo are
SFX A re cela are
SFX A re celi are
SFX A re cele are
SFX A re cene are
SFX A re glielo are
SFX A re gliela are
SFX A re glieli are
SFX A re gliele are
SFX A re gliene are
