dicts/it_IT/it_IT.dic
abbarbicare/ATXqr
abbinare/ATXqr
abbondare/ATXqr
abbrancare/ATXqr
abbuiare/ATXqr
abiurare/ATXqr
accaldare/ATXqr
accappiare/ATXqr
accastellare/ATXqr
accennare/ATXqr
acchiappare/ATXqr
accigliare/ATXqr
accoccolare/ATXqr
accomunare/ATXqr
accorpare/ATXqr
accreditare/ATXJ
acidulare/AT
acutizzare/ATXqr
addentrare/ATXqr
addoppiare/ATXqr
adirare/ATXqr
aduggiare/ATXqr
affacciare/ATXqr
affatturare/ATXqr
affidare/ATXqr
affissare/ATX
affratellare/ATXqr
agevolare/ATXqr
aggiogare/ATXqr
aggomitolare/ATXqr
aggricciare/ATXqr
agitare/ATXqr
albeggiare/ATXqr
alfabetizzare/ATXqr
allarmare/ATXqr
allevare/ATXqr
allocare/ATXqr
allungare/ATXqrJ
alzare/ATXqr
ammaccare/ATXqr
ammanierare/ATXqr
ammazzare/ATXqr
ammogliare/JATXqr
ammosciare/ATXqr
amplificare/ATXqr
ancheggiare/ATXqr
angolare/ATXYq
annegare/ATXqr
annoverare/ATXqr
ansare/ATUXqr
apostatare/ATXqr
appannare/ATXqr
appellare/ATXqr
appiattare/ATXqr
appisolare/JATXqr
appozzare/ATXqr
approntare/ATXqr
appuntellare/ATXqr
arcaizzare/ATX
arginare/ATXqr
arpeggiare/A
arrangiare/ATXqr
arricciare/ATXqr
arrolare/ATXqr
arrovellare/ATXqr
articolare/ASTX
asineggiare/ATXqr
assassinare/ATXqr
asserragliare/ATXqr
assillare/ATXqr
assoldare/ATXqr
assuolare/ATXqr
attardare/ATXqr
atterrare/ATXqr
attorcigliare/ATXqr
attristare/ATXqr
auscultare/ATXqr
autoassicurare/ATXqr
autofinanziare/ATXqr
autoproclamare/ATX
avanzare/ATXqr
avvantaggiare/ATXqr
avvicendare/ATXqr
avvistare/ATXJ
azotare/ATXqr
azzuffare/JATXqr
baciucchiare/A
ballare/A
bambineggiare/A
barbarizzare/A
bardare/A
basificare/A
bazzicare/A
beccuzzare/A
beneficiare/A
biancheggiare/A
bilanciare/A
biscottare/A
bittare/A
blindare/A
bollare/A
borbottare/A
bozzolare/A
brancolare/A
brigare/A
bronzare/A
bubbolare/A
buggerare/A
burocratizzare/A
cablografare/A
calcinare/A
camuffare/A
capezzare/A
capotare/A
caratterizzare/A
cartonare/A
cauzionare/A
centuplicare/A
chiurlare/A
cintare/AJ
clonare/A
collaborare/A
comandare/A
commutare/A
comportare/A
conclamare/A
confezionare/Ae
congiurare/A
conservare/A
conteggiare/A
contrastare/A
convocare/A
corroborare/A
covare/A
crittografare/A
cumulare/A
decaffeinare/A
decimare/A
decorare/AJ
deflazionare/A
deidrogenare/A
demineralizzare/A
dentellare/A
deportare/A
deregolare/A
destare/A
deviare/A
digiunare/A
dimagrare/A
disabilitare/A
disapprovare/A
discreditare/A
disimpacciare/A
disinstallare/A
dispensare/A
dissertare/A
disturbare/A
documentare/A
dotare/A
eccitare/ATXqr
elasticizzare/ATX
embricare/ATXqr
epilogare/ATXqr
erpicare/ATX
esecrare/ATXqr
espiantare/ATXqr
esteriorizzare/ATXqr
eternare/ATXqr
fagocitare/A
fascistizzare/A
fermentare/A
fidelizzare/A
firmare/A
foggiare/A
formicolare/A
franare/A
frenare/A
frustrare/A
gabellare/A
gassare/A
germinare/AJ
ghirlandare/A
gittare/A
glutinare/A
graffiare/A
grattugiare/A
guastare/A
idoleggiare/ATXqr
imbardare/ATqr
imbovinare/ATXqr
imbucare/ATXqr
immolare/ATXqr
impanare/ATXqr
impastoiare/ATXqr
imperlare/ATXqr
impiegare/ATXqr
impoppare/ATXqr
impugnare/ATXqr
inanellare/ATXqr
incanalare/ATXqr
incardinare/ATXqr
incattivare/A
incerare/ATXqr
incinerare/ATXqr
incordonare/ATXqr
incruscare/ATXqr
indietreggiare/ATXqr
infaldare/ATX
infilzare/ATXqr
inforestierare/ATX
infuriare/ATXqr
ingiuncare/ATXqr
ingravidare/ATXqr
innaffiare/ATXqr
inquinare/ATXqr
insolfare/ATX
intarlare/ATXqr
interfogliare/ATXqr
intestare/ATXqr
intregnare/ATXqr
invaginare/ATXqr
invigilare/ATX
ionizzare/ATXqr
irrogare/ATXqr
iterare/ATXqr
largheggiare/A
leggiucchiare/A
librare/A
livellare/A
lussare/A
maiolicare/A
manipolare/A
marnare/A
matematizzare/A
menare/A
mestare/A
microminiaturizzare/A
miniaturizzare/A
mitridatizzare/A
moltiplicare/A
mordicchiare/A
multare/A
nauseare/A
nicotinizzare/A
novellare/A
occasionare/ATXqr
ombrare/ATXqr
orbare/ATXqr
orpellare/ATXqr
ostare/ATX
ovulare/ATX
palesare/A
panoramicare/A
parcellizzare/A
passare/A
pauperizzare/A
pellettizzare/A
peregrinare/A
perpetrare/A
piagnucolare/A
pietrificare/A
pipiare/A
plagiare/A
politicizzare/A
posare/A
praticare/A
prefigurare/A
preoccupare/A
preventivare/A
prodigare/A
prolificare/A
prorogare/A
psicosomatizzare/A
purificare/A
quintuplicare/A
raccomandare/A
radicaleggiare/A
raffilare/A
raggricciare/A
rallignare/A
ramponare/A
rappigliare/A
rassottigliare/A
ravvoltolare/A
reclutare/A
reificare/A
reinstallare/A
reputare/A
rettificare/A
riaccompagnare/A
riaffiorare/A
rianimare/A
riarrestare/A
riavviare/A
ricalcificare/A
ricercare/A
riconciliare/A
ricordare/A
ridomandare/A
riesportare/A
riforestare/A
rigiuocare/A
rilimare/A
rimbombare/A
rimontare/A
rimpinzare/A
rincollare/A
rinfocare/A
rinominare/A
rintracciare/A
riordinare/A
ripopolare/A
riqualificare/A
risembrare/A
rispolverare/A
risucchiare/A
ritrattare/A
rivitalizzare/A
rosicchiare/A
ruotare/A
saggiare/A
saltabeccare/A
sarchiellare/A
sbalzare/A
sbavare/A
sbollentare/A
sbramare/A
sbronzare/A
scaffalare/A
scalpare/A
scannare/A
scarabocchiare/A
scarseggiare/A
scazzottare/A
schiaffare/A
sciabordare/A
sciorinare/A
scollegare/A
sconcertare/A
scoordinare/A
scorzare/A
scritturare/A
sdaziare/A
seghettare/A
separare/A
settare/A
sfasciare/A
sfidare/A
sfondare/A
sfrondare/A
sghignazzare/A
sgraffiare/A
sgrossare/A
sillabare/A
sinterizzare/A
sloggiare/A
smarginare/A
smistare/A
snervare/A
soffittare/A
solettare/A
solvatare/A
soprabbondare/A
sormontare/A
sottodimensionare/A
sovraffollare/A
spagliare/A
spappolare/A
spazzolare/A
sperequare/A
spezzare/A
spiegare/A
spirantizzare/A
spolmonare/A
sprezzare/A
spumeggiare/A
squarciare/A
staffare/A
stanziare/A
stemperare/A
stillare/A
stornare/A
stralodare/A
strascicare/A
strinare/A
struccare/A
subbiare/A
sudacchiare/A
supportare/A
svalorizzare/A
svergognare/A
svisare/A
tacchettare/A
tappare/AJ
tasteggiare/A
teleguidare/A
tentare/A
terrorizzare/A
tigrare/A
tombolare/A
torreggiare/A
tracheotomizzare/A
tramescolare/A
trapanare/A
traslitterare/A
travagliare/A
triforcare/A
trombettare/A
trusciare/A
turnificare/A
umiliare/ATXqr
utilizzare/ATXqr
vangare/A
vellutare/A
versare/A
vigliare/A
vitaliziare/A
volatilizzare/A
zaffare/A
zuccherare/A
